Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-806
Statutes; list of section numbers; rules of construction.

Unless the Legislature specifies otherwise or the legislative intent is clearly to the contrary, in construing statutes in effect prior to, on, or after July 10, 1984:

(1) If a list of statutes in a section in the form of two section numbers joined by the word to is amended to include a newly enacted statute which is assigned a section number which falls within the range of the specified list, the Revisor of Statutes shall not be required to print the statute showing both the original list and the section number of the newly enacted statute and the list shall be construed to encompass the new statute as of the date the newly enacted statute takes effect or becomes operative, whichever is later;

(2) If a list of statutes in a section is in the form of two section numbers joined by the word to and a statute, the section number of which falls within the range of the list, is repealed, the list shall be construed to exclude the repealed statute as of the date its repeal takes effect or becomes operative, whichever is later; and

(3) If a list of statutes by section numbers is defined to be a named act and the list is later amended to include an additional section or to exclude a repealed section, either by a direct change or by operation of subdivision (2) of this section, any reference to the act by name shall be construed to encompass the added or exclude the repealed section as of the date its enactment or repeal takes effect or becomes operative, whichever is later.

Laws 1984, LB 633, § 1.